Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle B. Procedure for Exercise of Appraisal Rights.

§79-4-13.20.
Notice of appraisal rights.

Where any corporate action specified in Section 79-4-13.02(a) is to be submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting, the meeting notice must state that the corporation has concluded that the shareholders are, are not or may be entitled to assert appraisal rights under this article. If the corporation concludes that appraisal rights are or may be available, a copy of this article must accompany the meeting notice sent to those record shareholders entitled to exercise appraisal rights.

In a merger pursuant to Section 79-4-11.05, the parent corporation must notify in writing all record shareholders of the subsidiary who are entitled to assert appraisal rights that the corporate action became effective. Such notice must be sent within ten (10) days after the corporate action became effective and include the materials described in Section 79-4-13.22.

Where any corporate action specified in Section 79-4-13.02(a) is to be approved by written consent of the shareholders pursuant to Section 79-4-7.04:

Written notice that appraisal rights are, are not or may be available must be sent to each record shareholder from whom a consent is solicited at the time consent of such shareholder is first solicited and, if the corporation has concluded that appraisal rights are or may be available, must be accompanied by a copy of this article; and

Written notice that appraisal rights are, are not or may be available must be delivered together with the notice to nonconsenting and nonvoting shareholders required by Section 79-4-7.04(e) and (f), may include the materials described in Section 79-4-13.22 and, if the corporation has concluded that appraisal rights are or may be available, must be accompanied by a copy of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.20; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 31; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 10; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 33, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2000 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2007 amendment substituted “Where any corporate action specified” for “If proposed corporate action described” in the first sentence in (a); added (c); and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “sent” for “given” preceding “to each record shareholder from whom a consent is solicited” in (c)(1).

Assessment of court costs and expenses in appraisal proceeding against corporation for failure to substantially comply with this section, see § 79-4-13.131.

§79-4-13.21.
Notice of intent to demand payment and consequences of voting or consenting.

If a corporate action specified in Section 79-4-13.02(a) is submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting, a shareholder who wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares:

Must deliver to the corporation, before the vote is taken, written notice of the shareholder’s intent to demand payment if the proposed action is effectuated; and

Must not vote, or cause or permit to be voted, any shares of such class or series in favor of the proposed action.

If a corporate action specified in Section 79-4-13.02(a) is to be approved by less than unanimous written consent, a shareholder who wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares must not sign a consent in favor of the proposed action with respect to that class or series of shares.

A shareholder who fails to satisfy the requirements of subsection (a) or (b) is not entitled to payment under this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.21; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 32; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 11; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 34, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2000 amendment redesignated former (a) as present (a), (a)(1) and (a)(2); substituted “requiring appraisal” for ‘creating dissenters” and “appraisal” for “dissenters,” and added “with respect to any class or series of shares” in (a); substituted “the shareholder’s” for “his” and deleted “for his shares” following “payment” in (a)(1); substituted “or cause or permit to be voted, any shares of such class or series” for “his shares” in (a)(2); and deleted “for his shares” following “payment” in (b).

The 2007 amendment in (a), substituted “a corporate” for “proposed corporate” and “specified in” for “requiring appraisal rights under”; added (b) and redesignated former (b) as present (c); in (c), substituted “fails to satisfy” for “does not satisfy,” and inserted “or (b)”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “sign” for “execute” preceding “a consent in favor of the proposed action” near the end of (b).

Dominant shareholder’s accountability to minority for profit, bonus, or the like, received on sale of stock to outsiders. 38 A.L.R.3d 738.

Timeliness and sufficiency of dissenting stockholder’s notice of his objection to consolidation or merger and of his demand for payment for his shares. 40 A.L.R.3d 260.

Valuation of stock of dissenting stockholders in case of consolidation or merger of corporation, sale of its assets, or the like. 48 A.L.R.3d 430.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 691-697.

§79-4-13.22.
Appraisal notice and form.

If proposed corporate action requiring appraisal rights under Section 79-4-13.02(a) becomes effective, the corporation must send a written appraisal notice and the form required by subsection (b)(1) to all shareholders who satisfied the requirements of Section 79-4-13.21(a) or Section 79-4-13.21(b). In the case of a merger under Section 79-4-11.05, the parent must deliver an appraisal notice and form to all record shareholders who may be entitled to assert appraisal rights.

The appraisal notice must be delivered no earlier than the date the corporate action specified in Section 79-4-13.02(a) became effective and no later than ten (10) days after such date, and must:

Supply a form that (i) specifies the date of the first announcement to shareholders of the principal terms of the proposed corporate action, if any, and (ii) if such announcement was made, requires the shareholder asserting appraisal rights to certify whether beneficial ownership of those shares for which appraisal rights are asserted was acquired before that date and that, as to those shares, the shareholder did not vote for or consent to the transaction;

State:

Be accompanied by a copy of this article.

Where the form must be sent and where certificates for certificated shares must be deposited and the date by which those certificates must be deposited, which date may not be earlier than the date for receiving the required form under subsection (2)(ii);

A date by which the corporation must receive the form, which date may not be fewer than forty (40) nor more that sixty (60) days after the date the subsection (a) appraisal notice is sent, and state that the shareholder shall have waived the right to demand appraisal with respect to the shares unless the form is received by the corporation by such specified date;

The corporation’s estimate of the fair value of the shares;

That, if requested in writing, the corporation will provide, to the shareholder so requesting, within ten (10) days after the date specified in subsection (2) (ii) the number of shareholders who return the forms by the specified date and the total number of shares owned by them; and

The date by which the notice to withdraw under Section 79-4-13.23 must be received, which date must be within twenty (20) days after the date specified in subsection (2)(ii); and

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.22; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 33; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 12; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 35, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2000 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2007 amendment substituted “Section 79-4-13.21(a) or Section 79-4-13.21(b)” for “Section 79-4-13-21” at the end of the first sentence in (a); inserted “specified in Section 79-4-13.02(a)” in (b); and substituted “earlier than” for “earlier that” in (2)(i).

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “send” for “deliver” preceding “a written appraisal” in the first sentence of (a); substituted “delivered” for “sent” in (b); and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

Assessment of court costs and expenses in appraisal proceeding against corporation for failure to substantially comply with this section, see § 79-4-13.131.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 698-699.

§79-4-13.23.
Perfection of rights; right to withdraw.

A shareholder who receives notice pursuant to Section 79-4-13.22 and who wishes to exercise appraisal rights must sign and return on the form sent by the corporation and, in the case of certificated shares, deposit the shareholder’s certificates in accordance with the terms of the notice by the date referred to in the notice pursuant to Section 79-4-13.22(b)(2)(ii).In addition, if applicable, the shareholder must certify on the form whether the beneficial owner of such shares acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before the date required to be set forth in the notice pursuant to Section 79-4-13.22(b)(1).If a shareholder fails to make this certification, the corporation may elect to treat the shareholder’s shares as after-acquired shares under Section 79-4-13.25. Once a shareholder deposits that shareholder’s certificates or, in the case of uncertificated shares, returns the signed forms, that shareholder loses all rights as a shareholder, unless the shareholder withdraws pursuant to subsection (b).

A shareholder who has complied with subsection (a) may nevertheless decline to exercise appraisal rights and withdraw from the appraisal process by so notifying the corporation in writing by the date set forth in the appraisal notice pursuant to Section 79-4-13.22(b)(2)(v). A shareholder who fails to so withdraw from the appraisal process may not thereafter withdraw without the corporation’s written consent.

A shareholder who does not sign and return the form and, in the case of certificated shares, deposit that shareholder’s share certificates where required, each by the date set forth in the notice described in Section 79-4-13.22(b), shall not be entitled to payment under this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.23; Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 34; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

The 2000 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2007 amendment rewrote (a); and substituted “sign” for “execute” in (c).

Dominant shareholder’s accountability to minority for profit, bonus, or the like, received on sale of stock to outsiders. 38 A.L.R.3d 738.

Timeliness and sufficiency of dissenting stockholder’s notice of his objection to consolidation or merger and of his demand for payment for his shares. 40 A.L.R.3d 260.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 691-697.

§79-4-13.24.
Payment.

Except as provided in Section 79-4-13.25, within thirty (30) days after the form required by Section 79-4-13.22(b)(2)(ii) is due, the corporation shall pay in cash to those shareholders who complied with Section 79-4-13.23(a) the amount the corporation estimates to be the fair value of their shares, plus interest.

The payment to each shareholder pursuant to subsection (a) must be accompanied by:

Financial statements of the corporation that issued the shares to be appraised, consisting of a balance sheet as of the end of a fiscal year ending not more than sixteen (16) months before the date of payment, an income statement for that year, a statement of changes in shareholders’ equity for that year, and the latest available interim financial statements, if any;

A statement of the corporation’s estimate of the fair value of the shares, which estimate must equal or exceed the corporation’s estimate given pursuant to Section 79-4-13.22(b)(2)(iii); and

A statement that shareholders described in subsection (a) have the right to demand further payment under Section 79-4-13.26 and that if any such shareholder does not do so within the time period specified therein, such shareholder shall be deemed to have accepted such payment in full satisfaction of the corporation’s obligations under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Former 1972 Code §79-4-13.24 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.24] deleted by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 35. Former 1972 Code §79-4-13.25 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.25] amended and renumbered as §79-4-13.24 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

This section, formerly appearing as § 79-4-13.25, was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-13.24 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 35.

A former § 79-4-13.24 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.24, eff from and after January 1, 1988], pertaining to share restrictions, was deleted by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 35, effective from and after July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment rewrote and renumbered the section.

Procedure if shareholder dissatisfied with payment or after made pursuant to this section or § 79-4-13.25, see § 79-4-13.26.

Assessment of court costs and expenses in appraisal proceeding against corporation for failure to substantially comply with this section, see § 79-4-13.131.

Valuation of stock of dissenting stockholders in case of consolidation or merger of corporation, sale of its assets, or the like. 48 A.L.R.3d 430.

Construction and operation of statute restricting corporation’s right to purchase its own stock to purchase from surplus. 61 A.L.R.3d 1049.

Propriety of applying minority discount to value of shares purchased by corporation or its shareholders from minority shareholders. 13 A.L.R.5th 840.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 699.

§79-4-13.25.
After-acquired shares.

A corporation may elect to withhold payment required by Section 79-4-13.24 from any shareholder who was required to, but did not certify that beneficial ownership of all of the shareholder’s shares for which appraisal rights are asserted was acquired before the date set forth in the appraisal notice sent pursuant to Section 79-4-13.22(b)(1).

If the corporation elected to withhold payment under subsection (a), it must, within thirty (30) days after the form required by Section 79-4-13.22(b)(2)(ii) is due, notify all shareholders who are described in subsection (a):

Of the information required by Section 79-4-13.24(b)(1);

Of the corporation’s estimate of fair value pursuant to Section 79-4-13.24(b)(2);

That they may accept the corporation’s estimate of fair value, plus interest, in full satisfaction of their demands or demand appraisal under Section 79-4-13.26;

That those shareholders who wish to accept such offer must so notify the corporation of their acceptance of the corporation’s offer within thirty (30) days after receiving the offer; and

That those shareholders who do not satisfy the requirements for demanding appraisal under Section 79-4-13.26 shall be deemed to have accepted the corporation’s offer.

Within ten (10) days after receiving the shareholder’s acceptance pursuant to subsection (b), the corporation must pay in cash the amount it offered under subsection (b)(2) to each shareholder who agreed to accept the corporation’s offer in full satisfaction of the shareholder’s demand.

Within forty (40) days after sending the notice described in subsection (b), the corporation must pay in cash the amount it offered to pay under subsection (b)(2) to each shareholder described in subsection (b)(5).

HISTORY:
Former 1972 Code §79-4-13.25 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.25] renumbered as §79-4-13.24 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 35. Former 1972 Code §79-4-13.27 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.27] amended and renumbered as §79-4-13.25 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 36; Laws, 2007, ch. 361, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

This section, formerly appearing as § 79-4-13.27, was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-13.25 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 36.
Former § 79-4-13.25 was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-13.24 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 35.

The 2000 amendment rewrote and renumbered the section.

The 2007 amendment inserted “was required to, but” following “any shareholder who” in (a).

Procedure if shareholder dissatisfied with payment or after made pursuant to this section or § 79-4-13.25, see § 79-4-13.26.

Court action to determine fair value of shares of shareholder’s after-acquired shares for which corporation elected to withhold payment under this section, see § 79-4-13.30.

Assessment of court costs and expenses in appraisal proceeding against corporation for failure to substantially comply with this section, see § 79-4-13.131.

§79-4-13.26.
Procedure if shareholder dissatisfied with payment or offer.

A shareholder paid pursuant to Section 79-4-13.24 who is dissatisfied with the amount of the payment must notify the corporation in writing of that shareholder’s estimate of the fair value of the shares and demand payment of that estimate plus interest (less any payment under Section 79-4-13.24). A shareholder offered payment under Section 79-4-13.25 who is dissatisfied with that offer must reject the offer and demand payment of the shareholder’s stated estimate of the fair value of the shares plus interest.

A shareholder who fails to notify the corporation in writing of that shareholder’s demand to be paid the shareholder’s stated estimate of the fair value plus interest under subsection (a) within thirty (30) days after receiving the corporation’s payment or offer of payment under Section 79-4-13.24 or Section 79-4-13.25, respectively, waives the right to demand payment under this section and shall be entitled only to the payment made or offered pursuant to those respective sections.

HISTORY:
Former 1972 Code §79-4-13.26 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.26] deleted by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 37. Former 1972 Code §79-4-13.28 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.28] amended and renumbered as §79-4-13.26 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

This section, formerly appearing as § 79-4-13.28, was amended and renumbered as present § 79-4-13.26 by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 37.

A former § 79-4-13.26 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 13.26, eff from and after January 1, 1988], pertaining to failure to take action, was deleted by Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 37, effective July 1, 2000.

The 2000 amendment rewrote and renumbered the section.

Commencement of court proceeding by corporation to determine fair value of shares and accrued interest if demand for payment under this section remains unsettled, see § 79-4-13.30.

Assessment of costs of appraisal proceeding against corporation, see § 79-4-13.31.

Dominant shareholder’s accountability to minority for profit, bonus, or the like, received on sale of stock to outsiders. 38 A.L.R.3d 738.

Timeliness and sufficiency of dissenting stockholder’s notice of his objection to consolidation or merger and of his demand for payment for his shares. 40 A.L.R.3d 260.

Propriety of applying minority discount to value of shares purchased by corporation or its shareholders from minority shareholders.

§79-4-13.27.
Renumbered.

Renumbered as §79-4-13.25 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 36.

Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 36, renumbered and amended former § 79-4-13.27 as present § 79-4-13.25.

§79-4-13.28.
Renumbered.

Renumbered as §79-4-13.26 by Laws, 2000, ch. 469, § 37.

Laws of 2000, ch. 469, § 37, renumbered and amended former § 79-4-13.28 as present § 79-4-13.26.